Utah statutes.
26-21a-203.   Department rulemaking authority.

The department shall make rules under Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act:

(1)  establishing quality assurance standards for all facilities performing screening or diagnostic mammography and developing mammogram x-ray films, including procedures for clinical follow-up of abnormal mammograms; and

(2)  providing for:

(a)  collection and periodic reporting of mammography examinations and clinical follow-up data to the department;

(b)  certification and revocation of certification of mammogram facilities;

(c)  inspection of mammogram facilities, including entry of agents of the department into the facilities for inspections;

(d)  setting fees for certification; and

(e)  an appeal process regarding department certification decisions.

